it: Scala del treno modello: Scala Fn3; Scala G; Ferrovia da giardino (scala grande); Scala HO; Scala N; Scala O; Scala OO; Scala On2; Scala On3; Scala On30; Scala S; Scala T; Scala TT; Scala Z; Altro
hu: Modellvasút léptéke: Fn3; G méretarány; Kerti vasút (nagy méretarány); H0 méretarány; N méretarány; O méretarány; OO méretarány; On2; On3; On30; S méretarány; T méretarány; TT méretarány; Z méretarány; Egyéb
es: Escala del tren de modelismo: Fn3; Escala G; Ferrocarril de jardín (gran escala); Escala HO; Escala N; Escala O; Escala OO; On2; On3; On30; Escala S; Escala T; Escala TT; Escala Z; Otro
ja: 鉄道模型スケール: Fn3スケール; Gスケール; 庭園鉄道 (ラージスケール); HOスケール; Nスケール; Oスケール; OOスケール; On2スケール; On3スケール; On30スケール; Sスケール; Tスケール; TTスケール; Zスケール; その他
sl-SI: Merilo modela vlaka: Merilo Fn3; Merilo G; Vrtna železnica (veliko merilo); Merilo HO; Merilo N; Merilo O; Merilo OO; Merilo On2; Merilo On3; Merilo On30; Merilo S; Merilo T; Merilo TT; Merilo Z; Drugo
ko: 모형 기차 스케일: Fn3; G 스케일; 가든 철도(대형 스케일); HO 스케일; N 스케일; O 스케일; OO 스케일; On2; On3; On30; S 스케일; T 스케일; TT 스케일; Z 스케일; 기타
lt-LT: Traukinio modeliuko mastelis: Fn3; G mastelis; Sodo geležinkelis (didelis mastelis); HO mastelis; N mastelis; O mastelis; OO mastelis; On2; On3; On30; S mastelis; T mastelis; TT mastelis; Z mastelis; Kita
th: มาตราส่วนรถไฟจำลอง: สเกล Fn3; สเกล G; รถไฟในสวน (สเกลใหญ่); สเกล HO; สเกล N; สเกล O; สเกล OO; สเกล On2; สเกล On3; สเกล On30; สเกล S; สเกล T; สเกล TT; สเกล Z; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Escala do trem de modelismo: Escala Fn3; Escala G; Ferrovia de jardim (escala grande); Escala HO; Escala N; Escala O; Escala OO; Escala On2; Escala On3; Escala On30; Escala S; Escala T; Escala TT; Escala Z; Outra
ro-RO: Scară pentru trenulețe de modelism: Fn3; Scară G; Cale ferată de grădină (scară mare); Scară HO; Scară N; Scară O; Scară OO; On2; On3; On30; Scară S; Scară T; Scară TT; Scară Z; Altele
pt-PT: Escala do modelo de comboio: Fn3; Escala G; Caminho de ferro de jardim (escala grande); Escala HO; Escala N; Escala O; Escala OO; On2; On3; On30; Escala S; Escala T; Escala TT; Escala Z; Outro
zh-TW: 鐵道模型比例: Fn3; G 比例; 花園鐵道 (大比例); HO 比例; N 比例; O 比例; OO 比例; On2; On3; On30; S 比例; T 比例; TT 比例; Z 比例; 其他
bg-BG: Скала на моделно влакче: Fn3; Мащаб G; Градинска железница (едър мащаб); Мащаб HO; Мащаб N; Мащаб O; Мащаб OO; On2; On3; On30; Мащаб S; Мащаб T; Мащаб TT; Мащаб Z; Друго
pl: Skala modelu pociągu: Skala Fn3; Skala G; Kolejka ogrodowa (duża skala); Skala HO; Skala N; Skala O; Skala OO; Skala On2; Skala On3; Skala On30; Skala S; Skala T; Skala TT; Skala Z; Inna
en: Model train scale: Fn3; G scale; Garden railway (large scale); HO scale; N scale; O scale; OO scale; On2; On3; On30; S scale; T scale; TT scale; Z scale; Other
sv: Skala för modelltåg: Fn3; Skala G; Trädgårdsjärnväg (stor skala); Skala HO; Skala N; Skala O; Skala OO; On2; On3; On30; Skala S; Skala T; Skala TT; Skala Z; Annan
da: Skala for modeltog: Fn3; Skala G; Havebane (stor skala); Skala HO; Skala N; Skala O; Skala OO; On2; On3; On30; Skala S; Skala T; Skala TT; Skala Z; Andet
hr-HR: Mjerilo modela vlaka: Fn3; Mjerilo G; Vrtna željeznica (veliko mjerilo); Mjerilo HO; Mjerilo N; Mjerilo O; Mjerilo OO; On2; On3; On30; Mjerilo S; Mjerilo T; Mjerilo TT; Mjerilo Z; Ostalo
de: Größe der Modelleisenbahn: Fn3; Maßstab G; Gartenbahn (Großbahn); Maßstab H0; Maßstab N; Maßstab 0; Maßstab 00; 0n2; 0n3; 0n30; Maßstab S; Maßstab T; Maßstab TT; Maßstab Z; Sonstige
zh-CN: 模型火车比例: Fn3 比例; G 比例; 花园铁路（大比例）; HO 比例; N 比例; O 比例; OO 比例; On2 比例; On3 比例; On30 比例; S 比例; T 比例; TT 比例; Z 比例; 其他
el: Κλίμακα μοντέλου σιδηροδρόμου: Fn3; Κλίμακα G; Σιδηρόδρομος κήπου (μεγάλη κλίμακα); Κλίμακα HO; Κλίμακα N; Κλίμακα O; Κλίμακα OO; On2; On3; On30; Κλίμακα S; Κλίμακα T; Κλίμακα TT; Κλίμακα Z; Άλλο
cs: Měřítko modelových vláčků: Fn3; Měřítko G; Zahradní železnice (velké měřítko); Měřítko HO; Měřítko N; Měřítko O; Měřítko OO; On2; On3; On30; Měřítko S; Měřítko T; Měřítko TT; Měřítko Z; Jiné
sk-SK: Rozmery hračkárskeho vláčika: Fn3; Mierka G; Záhradná železnica (veľká mierka); Mierka H0; Mierka N; Mierka O; Mierka OO; On2; On3; On30; Mierka S; Mierka T; Mierka TT; Mierka Z; Iné
nl: Modeltreinschaal: Fn3; G-schaal; Tuinspoor (grote schaal); H0-schaal; N-schaal; 0-schaal; 00-schaal; On2; On3; On30; S-schaal; T-schaal; TT-schaal; Z-schaal; Overig
fr: Échelle des trains miniatures: Fn3; Échelle G; Train de jardin (grande échelle); Échelle HO; Échelle N; Échelle O; Échelle OO; On2; On3; On30; Échelle S; Échelle T; Échelle TT; Échelle Z; Autre
ru: Масштаб модели поезда: Масштаб Fn3; Масштаб G; Садовая железная дорога (крупный масштаб); Масштаб HO; Масштаб N; Масштаб O; Масштаб OO; Масштаб On2; Масштаб On3; Масштаб On30; Масштаб S; Масштаб T; Масштаб TT; Масштаб Z; Другое
fi: Mallijunan mittakaava: Fn3; G-mittakaava; Piharatamittakaava (suuri mittakaava); HO-mittakaava; N-mittakaava; O-mittakaava; OO-mittakaava; On2; On3; On30; S-mittakaava; T-mittakaava; TT-mittakaava; Z-mittakaava; Muu
tr: Model tren ölçeği: Fn3; G ölçek; Bahçe demiryolu (büyük ölçek); HO ölçek; N ölçek; O ölçek; OO ölçek; On2; On3; On30; S ölçek; T ölçek; TT ölçek; Z ölçek; Diğer
vi: Tỷ lệ tàu hỏa mô hình: Fn3; Tỉ lệ G; Đường sắt sân vườn (tỉ lệ lớn); Tỉ lệ HO; Tỉ lệ N; Tỉ lệ O; Tỉ lệ OO; On2; On3; On30; Tỉ lệ S; Tỉ lệ T; Tỉ lệ TT; Tỉ lệ Z; Khác
nb: Skala for modelltog: Fn3; G-skala; Hagejernbane (stor skala); HO-skala; N-skala; O-skala; OO-skala; On2; On3; On30; S-skala; T-skala; TT-skala; Z-skala; Annet